src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
!***********************************************************************
!! # NUMBERS
!!
!! E. Uí Dhonnchadha
!!
!! Cardinal numbers are described seperately here rather than with other
!! Adjectives
!!
!! For Personal Numerals (duine, beirt, triúr) SEE NOUNS
!***********************************************************************

LEXICON Numerals  !!≈ -  **@CODE@** 

!! CARDINAL Numbers
aon+Num+Card:aon			NumSéUrú;   !!≈ -  **@CODE@** 
aon+Num+Card+hPref:haon		#;	 !!≈ -  **@CODE@**  le haon cheann de na ...
aon+Num+Card+Bare:haon		#;	 !!≈ -  **@CODE@**  a haon
aon+Num+Card+DefArt:t-aon	#;	 !!≈ -  **@CODE@**  the one; the ace
dó+Num+Card+Bare:dó			NumSéUrú; ! a dó (two)
dó+Num+Card:dhá				#; ! with a noun: dhá chapall (two horses)
dó+Num+Card+DefArt:dá		#;
trí+Num+Card:trí			NumSéUrú;
ceathair+Num+Card+Bare:ceathair	#; ! a ceathair (four)
ceathair+Num+Card:ceithre	NumSéUrú; ! ceithre chapall (four horses)
cúig+Num+Card:cúig			NumSéUrú;
sé+Num+Card:sé				NumSéUrú;
seacht+Num+Card:seacht		NumSéUrú; !!≈ -  **@CODE@** 
ocht+Num+Card:ocht			NumSéUrú; !!≈ -  **@CODE@** 
naoi+Num+Card:naoi			NumSéUrú; !!≈ -  **@CODE@** 
deich+Num+Card:deich		NumSéUrú;
fiche+Num+Card:fiche		NumSéUrú;
tríocha+Num+Card:tríocha	NumSéUrú;
daichead+Num+Card:daichead	NumSéUrú;
caoga+Num+Card:caoga		NumSéUrú;
seasca+Num+Card:seasca		NumSéUrú;
seachtó+Num+Card:seachtó	NumSéUrú;
ochtó+Num+Card:ochtó		NumSéUrú;
ochtó+Num+Card:t-ochtó		#;
nócha+Num+Card:nócha		NumSéUrú;
céad+Num+Card:céad			NumSéUrú; ! hundred
míle+Num+Card:míle			NumSéUrú;
milliún+Num+Card:milliún	NumSéUrú;

!! ORDINAL Numbers  !!≈ -  **@CODE@** 

céad+Num+Ord:céad			NumSéUrú;  !!≈ -  **@CODE@**  first
!céad+Num+Ord+Def:chéad	#; 
aon+Num+Ord:aonú			NumSéUrú;  !!≈ -  **@CODE@** 
aon+Num+Ord+Def:t-aonú		#;  !!≈ -  **@CODE@** 
dara+Num+Ord:dara			NumSéUrú;
dó+Num+Ord:dóú				NumSéUrú;
treas+Num+Ord:treas			NumSéUrú;
trí+Num+Ord:tríú			NumSéUrú;
ceathair+Num+Ord:ceathrú	NumSéUrú;
cúig+Num+Ord:cúigiú			NumSéUrú;
sé+Num+Ord:séú				NumSéUrú;
seacht+Num+Ord:seachtú		NumSéUrú;
ocht+Num+Ord:ochtú			NumSéUrú;
!!ocht+Num+Ord+Def:t-ochtú	#;
naoi+Num+Ord:naoú			NumSéUrú;
deich+Num+Ord:deichiú		NumSéUrú;

!! Number  Operators
++Num+Op:+	#;  !!≈ -  **@CODE@** 
-+Num+Op:-	#; !!≈ -  **@CODE@** 
*+Num+Op:*	#;
=+Num+Op:=	#;
/+Num+Op:/	#;
÷+Num+Op:÷	#;

LEXICON NumSéUrú !!≈ -  **@CODE@** 
#; !!≈ -  **@CODE@** 
+Len:^IM^Sé^tv		#; !!≈ -  **@CODE@** 
+Ecl:^IM^Urú		#;
+hPref:^IM^hv^ts	#;
